Hawaii statutes.
§183D-23 Licenses expire when. All
licenses shall expire on June 30 next following the date of issuance,
except for licenses obtained pursuant to section 183D-22(b)(3). [L 1985, c 174,
pt of §4; am L 2007, c 129, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next